Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.296

Continuing education provider status—Criteria to revoke—Report.

(1) By September 1, 2024, the Washington professional educator standards board must develop a process for the temporary or permanent revocation of continuing education provider status.

(a) Continuing education provider status may be revoked for providers that meet any of the following criteria:

(i) Providers that receive a substantial number of complaints filed against the provider, as determined by the board;

(ii) Providers found to not be in substantial compliance with RCW 28A.410.277; or

(iii) Providers found to offer course material that is not in substantial alignment with the cultural competency, diversity, equity, and inclusion standards of practice adopted in RCW 28A.410.260, as determined by the board.

(b) Entities authorized to submit a complaint under this section are limited to the following:

(i) Educators;

(ii) Local education agencies;

(iii) The office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(iv) Organizations representing principals;

(v) Organizations representing school board members;

(vi) Organizations representing school administrators;

(vii) Labor organizations representing classified instructional staff; and

(viii) Labor organizations representing teachers.

(2) By December 1, 2024, the professional educator standards board in consultation with the office of the superintendent of public instruction must submit to the relevant committees of the legislature a report on how to implement an auditing system of continuing education providers and other recommendations for improving the clock hour system.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "approved provider" and "provider" have the same meaning as "approved in-service education agency" in WAC 181-85-045, but apply only to providers of administrator or teacher continuing education programs focused on either equity-based school practices or the national professional standards for education leaders.

[ 2024 c 221 s 2.]